New Jersey, session 221, A5120.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  There is appropriated to the New Jersey Historic Trust the sum of $16,598,738 from dedicated corporation business tax revenues pursuant to Article VIII, Section II, paragraph 6 of the State Constitution in the Preserve New Jersey Historic Preservation Fund, established pursuant to section 9 of the Preserve New Jersey Act, P.L.2016, c.12 (C.13:8C-51), for the purpose of providing, for historic preservation projects approved as eligible for such funding:  (1) capital preservation grants as listed in subsection b. of this section; (2) historic site management grants as listed in subsection c. of this section; and (3) easement purchases as listed in subsection d. of this section. b.    The following historic preservation projects are eligible for funding in the form of capital preservation grants, as awarded by the New Jersey Historic Trust, using moneys appropriated pursuant to subsection a. of this section: County Municipality Name of Organization Project Name Grant Award Atlantic Atlantic City Atlantic City Fire Station #8 (Northside Institutional Historic District) 750,000 Atlantic Atlantic City Casino Reinvestment Development Authority Atlantic City Convention Hall 750,000 Atlantic Atlantic City Inlet Public/Private Association, Inc. Absecon Lighthouse 750,000 Bergen Fair Lawn Boro Borough of Fair Lawn Naugle-Vanderbeck House 537,509 Bergen Oradell Boro County of Bergen New Milford Plant of the Hackensack Water Company 750,000 Burlington New Hanover Twp New Hanover Township General Edward S. Godfrey House 149,257 Camden Camden City Home Port Alliance for the USS New Jersey, Inc. USS New Jersey (BB-62) 350,000 Camden Cherry Hill Twp Cherry Hill Township Kay-Evans Farmstead (Croft Farmstead) 638,286 Camden Gibbsboro Boro Borough of Gibbsboro John Lucas House 552,094 Cape May Lower Twp Mid-Atlantic Center for the Arts and Humanities (trading as Cape May MAC) Cape May Lighthouse 23,166 Cape May Lower Twp Lower Township Judge Nathaniel Foster House 150,000 Essex Livingston Twp Township of Livingston Theophilus Ward/Thomas Force House and Condit Family Cook House 370,750 Essex Montclair Twp The Montclair Foundation Van Vleck House & Gardens (Mountain Historic District) 337,197 Hudson Jersey City Save Ellis Island Statue of Liberty National Monument, Ellis Island and Liberty Island 191,152 Hudson Jersey City Jersey City Free Public Library Jersey City Public Library (Van Vorst Park Historic District) 600,000 Hunterdon Flemington Boro Hunterdon County Historical Society Doric House (Flemington Historic District) 8,153 Hunterdon Holland Twp Township of Holland Riegel Ridge Community Center 120,000 Hunterdon Raritan Twp Hunterdon Land Trust Case-Dvoor Farmstead 750,000 Mercer Hamilton Twp The Founders Committee, NJ State Society of National Society Daughters of the American Revolution Isaac Watson House 40,200 Mercer Hopewell Boro Borough of Hopewell Hopewell Railroad Station 146,676 Mercer Trenton City Historic Trenton Masonic Temple Masonic Temple (State House Historic District) 60,300 Mercer Trenton City City of Trenton Roebling Machine Shop 750,000 Mercer Lawrence Twp Lawrence Township Baker-Brearley House 400,000 Monmouth Asbury Park City Asbury Park African-American Music Project, Inc. Turf Club 313,075 Monmouth Shrewsbury Boro Monmouth County Historical Association Allen House 200,000 Monmouth West Long Branch Boro Monmouth University Shadow Lawn -  Phase 2 750,000 Morris Dover Town Dover Area Historical Society Condict House/ Presbyterian Church House (Blackwell Street Historic District) 150,000 Morris Mendham Boro Mendham Borough Cary Barn (Stephen Cary House) 434,845 Morris Morristown Town Morris County Historical Society Acorn Hall 168,225 Morris Morristown Town The Womans Club of Morristown, Inc. Dr. Lewis Condict House 350,900 Morris Mountain Lakes Boro Borough of Mountain Lakes Mountain Lakes Train Station (Mountain Lakes Historic District) 270,950 Morris Netcong Boro The Growing Stage  The Childrens Theatre of New Jersey Palace Theatre 150,000 Morris Rockaway Twp Township of Rockaway Ford-Faesch Manor House 400,000 Morris Washington Twp Middle Valley Community Center, Inc. Middle Valley Community Center (Middle Valley Historic District) 30,900 Ocean Toms River Twp Ocean County Historical Society Elizabeth Sculthorp Force House 12,600 Passaic Paterson City County of Passaic Passaic County Court House, and United States Custom House and Post Office Historic District  Phase 2 750,000 Passaic Wayne Twp Township of Wayne Van Duyne House 407,520 Somerset Bernards Twp The Friends of the Kennedy Martin Stelle Farmstead, Inc. Kennedy-Martin- Stelle Farmstead 577,384 Union Berkeley Heights Twp Township of Berkeley Heights Littel-Lord Farmstead 384,067 Union Clark Twp Township of Clark Seventeenth Century Clark House 145,950 Union Rahway City Merchants and Drovers Tavern Museum Association Merchants and Drovers Tavern 120,000 Union Scotch Plains Twp Preserve Shady Rest Committee Shady Rest Golf and Country Club 150,000 Union Union Twp Liberty Hall Museum Liberty Hall 89,844 TOTAL $15,031,000 c.     The following historic preservation projects are eligible for funding in the form of historic site management grants, as awarded by the New Jersey Historic Trust, using moneys appropriated pursuant to subsection a. of this section: County Municipality Name of Organization Project Name Grant Award Atlantic Atlantic City City of Atlantic City Atlantic City Fire Station #6/Atlantic City Fire Station #9 49,999 Atlantic Atlantic City Atlantic City Liberty Hotel 75,000 Bergen Dumont Boro Borough of Dumont Derick Banta House 25,875 Bergen Fair Lawn Boro Radburn Association Radburn Historic District 75,000 Burlington Bordentown City Bordentown Historical Society Clara Barton Schoolhouse (Bordentown Historic District) 43,867 Burlington Florence Twp Roebling Main Gate Museum 101 Second Avenue (Roebling Historic District) 18,750 Camden Camden City Camden County Historical Society Pomona Hall (Cooper House) 43,110 Cumberland Millville City Millville Army Air Field Museum (MAAFM) Millville Army Air Field Historic District 13,830 Essex Nutley Twp Van Riper House, Inc. Van Riper House 9,634 Hudson Weehawken Twp Township of Weehawken Hackensack Water Company Complex 56,250 Hunterdon Clinton Twp The 1759 Vought House, Inc., A Revolutionary War Loyalist Homestead Christoffel Vought Farmstead 16,111 Hunterdon Lambertville City The Kalmia Club The Kalmia Club 26,250 Hunterdon Readington Twp Readington Township Taylors Mill (Taylors Mill Historic District) 34,290 Hunterdon Stockton Boro Stockton Borough District No.98 Schoolhouse 43,875 Mercer Hamilton Twp The Founders Committee, NJ State Society of National Society Daughters of the American Revolution Isaac Watson House 53,400 Mercer Hamilton Twp Historical Society of Hamilton Township, Inc. Isaac Pearson House 20,145 Mercer Hopewell Twp Washington Crossing Park Association, Inc. Washington Crossing State Park 75,000 Mercer Trenton City Historic Trenton Masonic Temple Masonic Temple (State House Historic District) 31,350 Mercer Trenton City Greater Mt. Zion Community Development Corporation Greater Mount Zion African Methodist Episcopal Church 18,700 Mercer Trenton City Old Barracks Association Old Barracks 66,450 Monmouth Fair Haven Boro Borough of Fair Haven Fisk Chapel 38,625 Monmouth Middletown Twp Township of Middletown Dempsey Pump House 38,100 Monmouth Red Bank Boro Borough of Red Bank Monmouth Boat Club 45,000 Morris Boonton Town The Town of Boonton Darress Theatre 75,000 Morris Chester Twp Morris County Park Commission Willowwood Arboretum 47,175 Morris Randolph Twp Friends Meeting House & Cemetery Association of Randolph Township, NJ Friends Meetinghouse 75,000 Somerset Franklin Twp Franklin Inn-Van Liew Homestead Association, Inc. Van Liew Farmhouse (East Millstone Historic District) 39,540 Somerset Somerville Boro NJ Department of Environmental Protection Old Dutch Parsonage 75,000 Sussex Stillwater Twp Historical Society of Stillwater Township Casper and Abraham Shafer Grist Mill Complex 19,537 Sussex Vernon Twp Vernon Township Historic Society Rickey Farm 16,125 Union Rahway City City of Rahway Rahway Library 35,250 Union Plainfield City City of Plainfield Plainfield YMCA (Plainfield Civic Historic District) 26,250 Union Plainfield City Jerusalem Lodge No. 26 F & AM Plainfield Masonic Temple, Jerusalem Lodge No. 26 F & AM 75,000 Union Union Twp Union Township Historical Society Caldwell Parsonage 65,250 TOTAL $1,467,738 d.    Of the funds appropriated pursuant to subsection a. of this section, the sum of $100,000 shall be used by the New Jersey Historic Trust for the purpose of the following easement purchases: County Municipality Name of Organization Project Name Grant Award Burlington Bordentown City NJ Historic Trust Easement Purchase $100,000 TOTAL $100,000 e.     Any transfer of any funds, or change in project sponsor, site, or type, listed in subsection b., c., or d. of this section shall require the approval of the Joint Budget Oversight Committee or its successor. f.     To the extent that moneys remain available after the projects listed in subsection b., c., or d. of this section are offered funding pursuant thereto, any project that previously received funding for historic preservation purposes appropriated or reappropriated from any Green Acres bond act, any annual appropriations act, or the Garden State Historic Preservation Trust Fund established pursuant to section 21 of P.L.1999, c.152 (C.13:8C-21), or that receives funding pursuant to this act, shall be eligible to receive additional funding, as determined by the New Jersey Historic Trust, subject to the approval of the Joint Budget Oversight Committee or its successor. For the purposes of this subsection, "Green Acres bond act" means P.L.2009, c.117, P.L.2007, c.119, P.L.1995, c.204, P.L.1992, c.88, and P.L.1987, c.265. g.    The expenditure of moneys appropriated pursuant to this section is subject to the provisions of the Preserve New Jersey Act, P.L.2016, c.12 (C.13:8C-43 et seq.). 2.    There is appropriated to the New Jersey Historic Trust from the Preserve New Jersey Historic Preservation Fund, established pursuant to section 9 of the Preserve New Jersey Act, P.L.2016, c.12 (C.13:8C-51), the sum of $1,920,000 for paying administrative costs associated with administering the applicable provisions of P.L.2016, c.12 (C.13:8C-43 et seq.). 3.    There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Preserve New Jersey Historic Preservation Fund, established pursuant to section 9 of the Preserve New Jersey Act, P.L.2016, c.12 (C.13:8C-51), the sum of $18,518,738 to implement the provisions of this act. 4.    This act shall take effect immediately.